District of Columbia statutes.
22-2103

Murder in the second degree.

Whoever with malice aforethought, except as provided in §§ 22-2101, 22-2102, kills another, is guilty of murder in the second degree. For purposes of imprisonment following revocation of release authorized by § 24-403.01(b)(7), murder in the second degree is a Class A felony.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1321, ch. 854, § 800
June 12, 1940, 54 Stat. 347, ch. 339
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-302, § 4(c), 47 DCR 7249
Furlough eligibility, persons convicted under this section, see § 24-251.02.
This section is referenced in § 22-3152, § 23-113, § 23-546, § 24-112, and § 24-251.02.
1981 Ed., § 22-2403.
1973 Ed., § 22-2403.
D.C. Law 13-302 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(c) of the Sentencing Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-410, August 11, 2000, 47 DCR 7271).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(c) of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-462, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(c) of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(c) of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).